test/src/morphology/izh-test-A-kalatoin.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - kalatoin: # Adjective 'fishless'
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Nom: kalatoin
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Gen: kalattoman
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Acc: kalattoman
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Part: kalatointa
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Ill: kalattommaa
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Ine: kalattomas
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Ela: kalattomast
     kalatoin+N+Sg+All: kalattomalle
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Ade: kalattomal
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Abl: kalattomalt
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Tra: kalattomaks
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Ess: kalattomanna
     kalatoin+N+Sg+Exe: kalattomant

     kalatoin+N+Pl+Nom: kalattomat
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Gen: kalattommiin
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Acc: kalattomat
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Part: kalattommiä
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Ill: kalattommii
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Ine: kalattomis
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Ela: kalattomist
     kalatoin+N+Pl+All: kalattomille
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Ade: kalattomil
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Abl: kalattomilt
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Tra: kalattomiks
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Ess: kalattominna
     kalatoin+N+Pl+Exe: kalattomint
